Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2351
Treasurers; when not liable on bond.

No treasurer or ex officio treasurer shall be liable on his or her bond for money on deposit in a bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution and by direction of the proper legal authority, if the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution has given bond or gives security in accordance with section 77-2352. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1935, c. 5, § 2, p. 68;

Laws 1937, c. 22, § 2, p. 135;

Laws 1939, c. 103, § 2, p. 463;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2535;

R.S.1943, § 77-2351;

Laws 1967, c. 508, § 2, p. 1708;

Laws 1987, LB 109, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 64;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 42;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 60.